California statutes. Fish and Game Code
(f) This section does not limit the ability of the department or the commission to impose additional requirements, restrictions, or
 prohibitions related to the taking of bobcats, including a complete prohibition on the trapping of bobcats pursuant to this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 154, Sec. 73.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4156.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4157 and notwithstanding any other law, it is unlawful for a person to hunt, trap, or otherwise take a bobcat.

(b) The prohibitions of this section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) The take of a bobcat by a law enforcement officer or licensed veterinarian acting in the course and scope of official duty.

(2) The take of a bobcat based on a good faith belief that the take was necessary to protect a person from immediate bodily harm from the bobcat if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The person who
 committed the take notifies the department within five days after the take.

(B) A bobcat or part of the bobcat taken pursuant to this subdivision is not retained, sold, or removed from the site of the take without the authorization from the department.

(3) The take of a bobcat pursuant to Section 3960.2, 3960.6, or 4181.

(4) The take of a bobcat pursuant to Section 1002 or 3960.4.

(5) The take of a bobcat pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2116) of Division 3.

(6) The take of a bobcat by the department for the protection of a species listed as endangered or threatened under the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or the California Endangered Species Act
 (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 766, Sec. 4.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4157.

(a) Upon appropriation of funds by the Legislature for purposes of this section, commencing January 1, 2025, the commission may open a bobcat hunting season in any area determined by the commission to require a hunt.

(b) Before opening a bobcat hunting season in any area, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Consider the potential impacts of a bobcat hunting season, including the effects on all of the following:

(A) Bobcat populations.

(B) Bobcats’ wild prey.

(C) Disease
 abatement, including, but not limited to, hantavirus.

(D) The control of invasive species, especially nutria.

(2) Require the implementation of effective nonlethal management strategies to address public safety and livestock conflicts related to bobcats.

(3) Adopt the bobcat management plan developed by the department pursuant to Section 4158.

(4) Consider state residents’ values with regard to the trophy hunting of bobcats.

(5) Assess the costs to the department and the commission associated with bobcat hunting, including the administrative, implementation, and enforcement costs.

(c) Consistent with the requirements of
 Section 3031 and pursuant to Sections 713 and 1050, the commission shall set hunting license fees and associated fees for any subsequent seasons in which bobcat hunting is allowed, at the levels necessary to fully recover all the reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission associated with the hunting of bobcats in the state.

(d) This section does not limit the ability of the department or the commission to impose additional requirements, restrictions, or prohibitions related to the take of bobcats.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 766, Sec. 5.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4158.

(a) Before opening a bobcat hunting season pursuant to Section 4157, the department, in consultation with other relevant state agencies, local governments, federal agencies, nongovernmental organizations, landowners, and scientific entities, shall develop, upon appropriation by the Legislature, a bobcat management plan to inform and coordinate management decisions regarding bobcat populations. The bobcat management plan shall use credible science and utilize an ecosystem-based approach. The bobcat management plan shall be submitted by the department to the commission and the Legislature and shall include all of the following:

(1) A current statewide bobcat population estimate based on the best available science.

(2) An assessment of the overall health of the statewide bobcat population.

(3) A comprehensive strategy to manage bobcat populations and their habitat throughout the state, including, but not limited to, an assessment of the effects of climate change, such as from drought and wildfires; rodenticides; and human development on the state’s bobcats, the bobcats’ prey, and the bobcats’ habitats. The comprehensive strategy shall utilize the principles of adaptative management and incorporate recommendations for monitoring.

(4) An investigation of efficacious nonlethal solutions to prevent bobcat predation on livestock, primarily chickens or other domestic animals that the Department of Food and Agriculture deems needing widespread protections from bobcats.

(5) Recommendations for regulatory or statutory changes necessary to implement the bobcat management plan.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 766, Sec. 6.   (AB 1254)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Depredators [4180. - 4190.]

4180.

(a) Except as provided for in Section 4005, fur-bearing mammals that are injuring property may be taken at any time and in any manner in accordance with this code or regulations made pursuant to this code. Raw furs, as defined in Section 4005, that are taken under this section, shall not be sold.

(b) Traps used pursuant to this section shall be inspected and all animals in the traps shall be removed at least once daily. The inspection and removal shall be done by the person who sets the trap or the owner of the land where the trap is set or an agent of either.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4180.1.

(a) It is unlawful to do either of the following to an immature depredator mammal while it is in its den:

(1) Use a snare, hook, or barbed wire to remove the mammal.

(2) Use fire to kill the mammal.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the use of fire-ignited gas cartridges or other products registered or permitted under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. 136 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 84.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4180.2.

As used in this article, “wild pigs” has the meaning set forth in Section 4650.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 85.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.

(a) Except as provided in Section 4181.1, any owner or tenant of land or property that is being damaged or destroyed or is in danger of being damaged or destroyed by elk, bear, bobcat, beaver, wild pig, wild turkeys, or gray squirrels may apply to the department for a permit to kill the animals. Subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (d), the department, upon satisfactory evidence of the damage or destruction, actual or immediately threatened, shall issue a revocable permit for the taking and disposition of the animals under regulations adopted by the commission. The permit shall include a statement of the penalties that may be imposed for a violation of the permit conditions. Animals so taken shall not be sold or shipped from the premises
 on which they are taken except under instructions from the department. An iron-jawed or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed trap shall not be used to take any bear or bobcat pursuant to this section. Poison of any type shall not be used to take any gray squirrel or wild turkey pursuant to this section. The department shall designate the type of trap to be used to ensure the most humane method is used to trap gray squirrels. The department may require trapped squirrels to be released in parks or other nonagricultural areas. It is unlawful for any person to violate the terms of any permit issued under this section.

(b) The permit issued for taking bears or bobcats pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain the following facts:

(1) Why the issuance of the permit was necessary.

(2) What efforts were made to solve the problem without killing the bears or bobcats.

(3) What corrective actions should be implemented to prevent a reoccurrence.

(c) With respect to wild pigs, the department shall provide an applicant for a depredation permit to take wild pigs or a person who reports taking wild pigs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4181.1 with written information that sets forth available options for wild pig control, including, but not limited to, depredation permits, allowing periodic access to licensed hunters, and holding special hunts authorized pursuant to Section 4188. The department may maintain and make available to these persons lists of licensed hunters interested in wild pig
 hunting and lists of nonprofit organizations that are available to take possession of depredating wild pig carcasses. The department shall not limit the number of wild pigs to be taken under a depredation permit or based on the sex of the wild pig.

(d) With respect to elk, the following procedures shall apply:

(1) Before issuing a depredation permit pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall do all of the following:

(A) Verify the actual or immediately threatened damage or destruction.

(B) Provide a written summary of corrective measures necessary to immediately alleviate the problem.

(C) Determine the viability of the local herd, and determine the minimum population level needed to maintain the herd.

(D) Ensure the permit will not reduce the local herd below the
 minimum.

(E) Work with affected landowners to develop measures to achieve long-term resolution while maintaining viability of the herd.

(2) After completing the statewide elk management plan pursuant to Section 3952, the department shall use the information and methods contained in the plan to meet the requirements of subparagraphs (C), (D), and (E) of paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 19.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.1.

(a) Any bear that is encountered while in the act of inflicting injury to, molesting, or killing, livestock may be taken immediately by the owner of the livestock or the owner’s employee if the taking is reported no later than the next working day to the department and the carcass is made available to the department.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 4652, any wild pig that is encountered while in the act of inflicting injury to, molesting, pursuing, worrying, or killing livestock or damaging or destroying, or threatening to immediately damage or destroy, land or other property, including, but not limited to, rare, threatened, or endangered native plants, wildlife, or aquatic species, may be taken immediately by the owner of the
 livestock, land, or property or the owner’s agent or employee, or by an agent or employee of any federal, state, county, or city entity when acting in their official capacity. The person taking the wild pig shall report the taking no later than the next working day to the department and shall make the carcass available to the department. Unless otherwise directed by the department and notwithstanding Section 4657, the person taking a wild pig pursuant to this subdivision, or to whom the carcass of a wild pig taken pursuant to this subdivision is transferred pursuant to subdivision (c), may possess the carcass of the wild pig. The person in possession of the carcass shall make use of the carcass, which may include an arrangement for the transfer of the carcass to another person or entity, such as a nonprofit organization, without compensation. The person who arranges this transfer shall be deemed to be in compliance with Section 4304. It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this subdivision shall
 be interpreted to authorize a person to take wild pigs pursuant to this subdivision in violation of a state statute or regulation or a local zoning or other ordinance that is adopted pursuant to other provisions of law and that restricts the discharge of firearms.

(c) The department shall make a record of each report made pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) and may have an employee of the department investigate the taking or cause the taking to be investigated. The person taking a wild pig shall provide information as deemed necessary by the department. Upon completion of the investigation, the investigator may, upon a finding that the requirements of this section have been met with respect to the particular bear or wild pig taken under subdivision (a) or (b), issue a written statement to the person confirming that the requirements of this section have been met. The person who took the wild pig may transfer the carcass to another person without
 compensation.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 4763, any part of any bear lawfully possessed pursuant to this section is subject to Section 4758.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits federal, state, or county trappers from killing or trapping bears when the bears are killing or molesting livestock, but no iron-jawed or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed trap shall be used to take the bear, and no person, including employees of the state, federal, or county government, shall take bear with iron-jawed or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed traps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 86.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.2.

For the purposes of this article relating to damage caused by wild pigs, “damage” means loss or harm resulting from injury to person or property. The department shall develop statewide guidelines to aid in determining the damage caused by wild pigs. The guidelines shall consider various uses of the land impacted by pigs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 481, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4181.5.

(a) Any owner or tenant of land or property that is being damaged or destroyed or is in immediate danger of being damaged or destroyed by deer may apply to the department for a permit to kill those deer. The department, upon satisfactory evidence of actual or immediately threatened damage or destruction shall, pursuant to regulations adopted by the commission, issue a revocable permit for the taking and disposition of those deer, for a designated period not to exceed 60 days.

(b) The regulations of the commission shall include provisions concerning the type of weapons to be used to kill the deer. The weapons shall be those as will ensure humane killing, but the regulations of the commission shall provide for the use of a
 sufficient variety of weapons to permit the designation of particular types to be used in any particular locality commensurate with the need to protect persons and property. Firearms using .22-caliber rimfire cartridges may be used only when authorized by the director or the director’s designee. No pistols shall be used.

(c) The caliber and type of weapon to be used by each permittee shall be specified in each permit by the issuing officer who shall take into consideration the location of the area, the necessity for clean kills, the safety factor, local firearms ordinances, and other factors that apply. Rifle ammunition used shall have expanding bullets; shotgun ammunition shall have only single slugs, or, if authorized by the department, 0 or 00 buckshot.

(d) At the time a permit is issued pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall issue tags similar to those provided for
 in Section 4331. The permittee shall carry the tags while hunting the deer for which the permit was issued, and upon killing any deer, shall immediately do all of the following:

(1) Fill out both parts of the tag, and clearly punch out the date of the kill.

(2) Attach one part of the completed tag to the antlers of antlered deer, or to the ear of any other deer, and keep that part of the tag attached to the deer until 10 days after the permit has expired.

(3) Obtain a countersignature on the other part of the tag pursuant to Section 4341.

(4) Send the countersigned part of the tag to the department.

(e) A permit issued pursuant to this section may be renewed only after a finding by the
 department that further damage has occurred or will occur, unless that permit is renewed. A person seeking renewal of the permit pursuant to this subdivision shall do all of the following:

(1) Account for all prior tags previously issued with all prior permits.

(2) If any of the previously issued tags are unused, show either of the following:

(A) That any deer previously killed pursuant to a previously issued permit could not reasonably have been tagged.

(B) Why the killing was not accomplished within the time allotted for that killing, and why the killing would be accomplished under a new time period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 87.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4185.

In any district or part of a district within San Bernardino and Riverside Counties, bears may be taken at any time with traps within a good and substantial fence, as such fence is described in Section 17121 of the Food and Agricultural Code, surrounding beehives, if no part of the fence is at a distance greater than 50 yards from a beehive, and if a conspicuous sign is posted and maintained at each entrance to the enclosed premises to give warning of the presence of the traps. No iron or steel-jawed or any type of metal-jawed trap shall be used to take bear under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 101, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

4186.

Nothing in this code prohibits the owner or tenant of land, or any person authorized in writing by that owner or tenant, from taking cottontail or brush rabbits during any time of the year when damage to crops or forage is being experienced on that land. Any person other than the owner or tenant of the land shall have in possession when transporting rabbits from the property, written authority from the owner or tenant of land where those rabbits were taken. Rabbits taken under this section shall not be sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4188.

(a) If a landowner or tenant applies for a permit under Section 4181 to take wild pigs or wild turkeys, or under Section 4181.5 to take deer, the department shall notify the applicant about available options for allowing access by licensed hunters, including, but not limited to, access authorized pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 to control wild pigs, wild turkeys, and deer.

(b) The commission, in lieu of a permit described in subdivision (a), and with the consent of, or upon the request of, the landowner or tenant, may pursuant to appropriate regulation authorize the issuance of permits to persons holding valid hunting licenses to take wild pigs, wild turkeys, or deer in
 sufficient numbers to stop the damage or threatened damage. Before issuing permits to licensed hunters, the department shall investigate and determine the number of permits necessary, the territory involved, the dates of the proposed hunt, the manner of issuing the permits, and the fee for the permit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 88.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4190.

The department shall tag, brand, or otherwise identify in a persistent and distinctive manner any large depredatory mammal relocated by, or relocated with the approval of, the department for game management purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Deer [4301. - 4371.]



  ARTICLE 1. Taking Deer [4301. - 4304.]

4301.

(a) As used in this section, “deer” includes any animal of the family Cervidae.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, it is unlawful to sell, purchase, or transport for the purpose of sale any deer meat in this state whether fresh, smoked, canned, or preserved by any means.

(c) The prohibition in subdivision (b) does not apply to the following:

(1) Conduct authorized by provisions of this code permitting the sale of domestically raised game mammals.

(2) Fallow deer meat processed by a slaughterer in accordance with Chapter
 4 (commencing with Section 18650) of, and Chapter 4.1 (commencing with Section 18940) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(3) Deer meat imported into this state from a foreign country for the purpose of preparing and selling for human consumption a product commonly known and properly labeled as venison jerky, deer jerky, venison salami, or deer salami.

(d) All deer meat imported into this state shall meet all of the sanitary and inspection requirements for wholesomeness, except an antemortem inspection, but including a postmortem inspection, as required for other meat imported for human consumption.

(e) The deer meat shall be in an identifiable condition and accompanied by a bill of lading, showing the name of the consignor, the consignee, and the weight of the deer meat shipped. A copy of the
 bill of lading shall be delivered to the nearest office of the department either prior to, or not later than, two days from the date of receipt of the deer meat.

(f) No deer meat imported into this state may leave the premises of the original consignee unless written permission is received from the department, or unless it is processed into the form of the product commonly known as jerky or salami.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 89.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4302.

Any person taking a deer shall retain possession of that portion of the deer’s head that in adult males normally bears the antlers, during the open season for that deer and for 15 days thereafter, and shall produce that portion of the head upon the demand of any officer authorized to enforce the provisions of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 90.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4303.

The skin or hide of any deer lawfully taken may be sold, purchased, tanned, or manufactured into articles for sale.

Skins or hides of deer lawfully taken may be donated at any time to veterans’ organizations or veterans’ service committees for use by veterans for rehabilitation purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 111.)
-------------------------------------------

4304.

(a) No person shall capture or destroy any deer and detach or remove from the carcass only the head, hide, antlers, or horns.

(b) No person shall through carelessness or neglect leave any game mammal, exotic game mammal, or game bird that is in that person’s possession, or any of the flesh of that animal usually eaten by humans, to go needlessly to waste.

(c) The provisions of this section do not apply to game mammals taken pursuant to Section 4152.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 21) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 92.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. License Tags [4330. - 4341.]

4330.

It is unlawful to take any deer without first procuring a deer tag or permit authorizing the taking of that deer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4331.

The commission may determine the design and makeup of the deer tag and prescribe the procedures for issuance and use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4332.

(a) Any resident of this state, 12 years of age or over, who possesses a valid hunting license, may procure one tag for the taking of one deer by one person during the current license year, upon payment of the base fee of ten dollars ($10) for the license year beginning July 1, 1986, and the base fee as adjusted under Section 713 for subsequent license years.

(b) Any nonresident of this state, 12 years of age or over, who possesses a valid hunting license, may procure one tag for the taking of one deer by one person during the current license year, upon payment of the base fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the license year beginning July 1, 1986, and the base fee as adjusted under Section 713 for subsequent license years.

(c) If provided in regulations adopted by the commission under Section 200, any resident of this state, 12 years of age or over, who possesses a deer tag may procure one additional deer tag for the taking of one additional deer during the current license season, upon payment of the base fee of twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) for the license years beginning July 1, 1986, and the base fee as adjusted under Section 713 for subsequent license years.

(d) If provided in regulations adopted by the commission under Section 200, any nonresident of this state, 12 years of age or over, who possesses a deer tag may procure one additional deer tag for the taking of one additional deer during the current license season, upon payment of the base fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for the license year beginning July 1, 1986, and the base fee as adjusted under Section 713 for subsequent
 license years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 93.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4333.

Tags are valid only during that portion of the current hunting license year in which deer may be taken or possessed in any area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 86.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4334.

(a) The commission shall annually direct the department to authorize, pursuant to Section 1054.8, the sale of not more than 10 deer tags for the purpose of raising funds for programs and projects as set forth in Section 3953. All revenue from the sale of tags pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Big Game Management Account established in Section 3953 and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall be expended as set forth in that section.

(b) These tags may be sold to residents or nonresidents of the State of California at auction or by any other method and are not subject to the fees prescribed by Section 4332. 

(c) These
 funds shall augment, not supplant, any other funds appropriated to the department for the preservation, restoration, utilization, and management of deer. All revenues derived from the sale of these tags shall be remitted to the department by the seller.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 408, Sec. 10.   (SB 1058)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4336.

(a) The person to whom a deer tag has been issued shall carry the tag while hunting deer. Upon the killing of any deer, that person shall immediately fill out the tag completely, legibly, and permanently, and cut out or punch out and completely remove notches or punch holes for the month and date of the kill. The deer tag shall be immediately attached to the antlers of antlered deer or to the ear of any other deer and kept attached during the open season and for 15 days thereafter. The holder of the deer tag shall immediately, upon harvesting a deer, notify the department in a manner specified by the commission.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this code or regulation adopted pursuant to this code, it is unlawful to possess any untagged deer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4340.

(a) Any person who is convicted of a violation of any provision of this code, or of any rule, regulation, or order made or adopted under this code, relating to deer shall forfeit his or her deer tags, and no new deer tags shall be issued to that person during the then current license year for hunting licenses.

(b) No person described in subdivision (a) may apply for deer tags for the following license year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4341.

Any person legally killing a deer in this state shall have the tag for that deer countersigned by a person employed by the department, a person designated for that purpose by the commission, a notary public, a postmaster, a peace officer, or an officer authorized to administer oaths, before transporting the deer, except to transport the deer to the nearest person authorized to countersign the tag, on the route from where the deer is taken to that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 94.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Archery Deer Hunting [4370. - 4371.]

4370.

(a) In every area in which deer may lawfully be taken during the general open season there is an archery season for the taking of deer with bow and arrow. The season for each area shall be as the commission may prescribe, with a minimum interposing interval of three days immediately preceding the regular open season on deer in that area. Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person taking or attempting to take deer during such archery season shall neither carry, nor have under his or her immediate control, any firearm of any kind.

(b) A peace officer listed in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, whether active or honorably retired, may
 carry a firearm capable of being concealed on his or her person while engaged in the taking of deer with bow and arrow in accordance with subdivision (a), but shall not take or attempt to take deer with the firearm.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 711, Sec. 1.   (SB 1367)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4371.

The provisions of this code relating to deer shall be applicable to the taking of deer with bow and arrow.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Marine Mammals [4500. - 4502.5.]

4500.

(a) It is unlawful to take any marine mammal except in accordance with provisions of the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 1361) of Title 16 of the United States Code) or provisions of Title 50 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or pursuant to subdivision (b) of this section.

(b) At such time as federal laws or regulations permit the state to assume jurisdiction over marine mammals, the commission may adopt regulations governing marine mammals and the taking thereof.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, “marine mammals” means sea otters, whales, dolphins, porpoises, seals, and sea lions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 786.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that several types of nonpoint source pollution are harmful to sea otters, and that scientific studies point to links between cat feces, the pathogen T-gondii, and sea otter mortality. The Legislature further finds and declares that efforts to reduce the flushing of cat litter and cat feces are steps toward better water quality in the sea otters’ natural habitat.

(b) Any cat litter offered for sale in this state shall contain one of the following statements:

(1) “Encouraging your cat to use an indoor litter box, or properly disposing of outdoor cat feces, is beneficial to overall water quality. Please do not flush cat litter in toilets or dispose of it outdoors in gutters or storm drains.”

(2) A general statement that encourages the disposal of cat feces in trash and discourages flushing cat feces in toilets or disposing of them in drains.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.5.

This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Orca Protection Act.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) and subdivision (c), hold in captivity an orca, whether wild-caught or captive-bred, for any purpose, including, but not limited to, display, performance, or entertainment purposes.

(B) An orca located in the state on January 1, 2017, may continue to be held in captivity for its current purpose and
 after June 1, 2017, may continue to be used for educational presentations.

(2) Breed or impregnate any orca held in captivity in the state.

(3) Export, collect, or import the semen, other gametes, or embryos of an orca held in captivity for the purpose of artificial insemination.

(4) Export, transport, move, or sell an orca located in the state to another state or country unless otherwise authorized by federal law or if the transfer is to another facility within North America that meets standards comparable to those provided under the Animal Welfare Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2131 and following).

(b) A person, corporation, or institution that
 intentionally or negligently violates subdivision (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(c) This section does not apply to an orca that is held by a bona fide educational or scientific institution for rehabilitation after a rescue or stranding or for research purposes. However, the department shall be notified immediately upon the rescue or acquisition of any orca, and an orca that is held for rehabilitation or research purposes shall be returned to the wild whenever possible. If return to the wild is not possible, the orca may be used for educational presentations, but shall not be used for breeding, performance, or entertainment purposes.

(d) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as follows:

(1) “Educational presentation” means a live, scheduled orca display in the presence of spectators that includes natural behaviors, enrichment, exercise activities, and a live narration and video content that provides science-based education to the public about orcas.

(2) “Orca” means a killer whale (Orcinus orca).

(3) “Bona fide educational or scientific institution” means an institution that establishes through documentation any of the following:

(A) Educational or scientific tax exemption from the Internal Revenue Service or the institution’s national, state, or local tax authority.

(B) Accreditation as an educational or scientific
 institution from a qualified national, regional, state, or local authority for the institution’s location.

(C) Accreditation by a nationally or internationally recognized zoological or aquarium accreditation organization.

(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 340, Sec. 8.   (SB 839)   Effective September 13, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Burros [4600. - 4600.]

4600.

(a) It is unlawful to kill, wound, capture, or have in possession any undomesticated burro, except as provided in Section 53074.5 of the Government Code.

(b) As used in this section, “undomesticated burro” means a wild burro or a burro which has not been tamed or domesticated for a period of three years after its capture. The fact that a burro was killed, wounded, or captured on publicly owned land, or on land owned by a person other than the person who killed, wounded, or captured the burro is prima facie evidence that the burro was an undomesticated burro at the time it was killed, wounded, or captured.

(c) Neither the commission nor any other department or agency has any power to modify the provisions of this section by any order, rule, or regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 128, Sec. 1.   Effective July 27, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Wild Pigs [4650. - 4657.]

4650.

(a) For purposes of this code, “wild pig” means any of the following:

(1) (A) A pig having two or more phenotypical characteristics specified in subparagraph (B) that does not have a brand, tattoo, or other permanent mark or visible tag approved by the Department of Food and Agriculture pursuant to Section 10791 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(B) Phenotypical characteristics include all of the following:

(i) Having a coat described by all of the following: long, dark, coarse bristles and guard hairs; the undercoat, when
 present, is lighter in color than the overlaying coat; and individual hairs have bristle tips that are lighter in color than the rest of the hair shaft.

(ii) Having dark “point” coloration: distal portion of the snout, ears, legs, and tail are dark brown to black in coloration.

(iii) Having a skeletal appearance that has both of the following characteristics: the skull is large, measuring up to one-third of the total body length; and a short massive trunk with underdeveloped hindquarters.

(iv) Having a head with small, deep-set eyes and an elongated snout.

(v) Having a tail held straight or slightly curved but containing muscular structure to curl the
 tail.

(vi) Having teeth satisfying all of the following, as applicable: males have well-developed canine teeth; upper canines are relatively short and grow sideways early in life and gradually curl upwards with age; lower canines are sharper and longer with exposed parts measuring up to 12 cm (4.7 inches) in length.

(2) A free-roaming pig, feral pig, or European wild boar having no visible tags, markings, or characteristics indicating that the pig or boar is from a domestic herd.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 22) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 23.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4651.5.

(a) The department shall work with landowners to mitigate depredation by sport hunting pursuant to this chapter, including the application of the Shared Habitat Alliance for Recreational Enhancement (SHARE) program (Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of Chapter 5 of Division 2).

(b) The use of poison to take wild pigs is prohibited.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 469, Sec. 25.   (SB 856)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4652.

(a) It is unlawful to take any wild pig, except as provided in Section 4181, without first procuring a validation authorizing the taking of that wild pig in accordance with this chapter.
